Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.60.020

Forgery.

(1) A person is guilty of forgery if, with intent to injure or defraud:

(a) He or she falsely makes, completes, or alters a written instrument or;

(b) He or she possesses, utters, offers, disposes of, or puts off as true a written instrument which he or she knows to be forged.

(2) In a proceeding under this section that is related to an identity theft under RCW 9.35.020, the crime will be considered to have been committed in any locality where the person whose means of identification or financial information was appropriated resides, or in which any part of the offense took place, regardless of whether the defendant was ever actually in that locality.

(3) Forgery is a class C felony.

[ 2011 c 336 s 382; 2003 c 119 s 5; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 38 s 13; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.60.020.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 38: See notes following RCW 9A.08.020.